Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB986.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Unfair Real Estate Service Agreements Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Association." As defined under 15 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Consumer." A person who is the recipient or anticipated recipient of a real estate service."Person." A natural person, corporation, corporate fiduciary, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability 123456789101112131415161718 company, joint venture or association."Real estate service." As defined under section 201 of the act of February 19, 1980 (P.L.15, No.9), known as the Real Estate Licensing and Registration Act."Real estate service agreement." A contract under which a real estate service provider agrees to provide a real estate service to a consumer."Real estate service provider." A person providing or who is anticipated to provide a real estate service to a consumer pursuant to a real estate service agreement."Recording." Presenting a document to a county recorder of deeds for official placement in the public land records."Unfair real estate service agreement." A real estate service agreement that:(1) purports to run with the land or to be binding on future owners of interests in the real property;(2) purports to create or allow a lien, encumbrance or other security interest in the property; or(3) allows for the agreement to be assigned without timely notification to the owner of the property.Section 3. Unfair real estate service agreements.(a) Enforceability.--An unfair real estate service agreement is void and unenforceable as a matter of law.(b) Deceptive act.--An unfair real estate service agreement entered into with a consumer shall be deemed a deceptive act under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(c) Recording prohibited.--(1) A person may not record or cause to be recorded an unfair real estate service agreement or notice or memorandum 20250HB0986PN1076 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of an unfair real estate service agreement in this Commonwealth.(2) A person who violates paragraph (1) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.(3) If an unfair real estate service agreement is recorded in this Commonwealth, it shall not provide actual or constructive notice against an otherwise bona fide purchaser or creditor.(d) Recording of court order.--If an unfair real estate service agreement or a notice or memorandum of an unfair real estate service agreement is recorded in this Commonwealth, a party with an interest in the real property that is the subject of the agreement may apply to the court of jurisdiction in the county where the recording exists to record a court order declaring the agreement unenforceable.(e) Right of recovery.--(1) A consumer with an interest in real property that is the subject of an unfair real estate service agreement, whether or not any lien or other notice is filed against the property in the office of the county recorder of deeds, may bring a civil action against the real estate service provider. Relief shall include, but not be limited to:(i) Preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate.(ii) An order that the consumer is not required to repay or reimburse any money paid to the consumer by the real estate services provider.(iii) Actual damages suffered by the consumer, as follows:(A) Except as provided under clause (B), damages 20250HB0986PN1076 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall equal the amount of damages suffered by the consumer or $5,000, whichever amount is greater.(B) If the consumer is 60 years of age or older, damages shall equal the amount of damages suffered by the consumer or $15,000, whichever amount is greater.(iv) Reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.(2) This section shall not replace or supersede any other remedy at law or equity that the consumer may have.(f) Relationship to other laws.--Nothing in this section shall alter or amend any part of the act of February 19, 1980 (P.L.15, No.9), known as the Real Estate Licensing and Registration Act.Section 4. Penalties.(a) Unenforceability and violation of other State law.--If a violation of section 3 occurs, the realty agreement shall be deemed unenforceable and the violation shall constitute an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(b) Damages.--In addition to the penalties specified under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, a real estate professional found to be in violation of this act shall be subject to actual damages incurred by any person with an interest in the residential real property that is the subject of the unenforceable realty agreement, including reasonable costs and attorney fees.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0986PN1076 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829